District of Columbia statutes.
38-2904

Weightings applied to counts of students enrolled at certain grade levels.

The student counts at certain grade levels and in certain programs shall be weighted to provide an amount per student differing from the basic foundation level in accordance with the following schedule:

Grade Level
Weighting
Per Pupil Allocation in FY 2015

Pre-Kindergarten 3
1.34
$12,719

Pre-Kindergarten 4
1.30
$12,340

Kindergarten
1.30
$12,340

Grades 1-5
1.00
$9,492

Grades 6-8
1.08
$10,251

Grades 9-12
1.22
$11,580

Alternative program
1.44
$13,668

Special education school
1.17
$11,106

Adult
0.89
$8,448

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-207, § 105, 45 DCR 8095
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 3402(c), 49 DCR 6968
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 102(b), 49 DCR 11664
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 312(b), 50 DCR 5668
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 4002(b), 51 DCR 8441
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 4012(b), 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 61, 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 4002(c), 53 DCR 6899
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 4002(c), 54 DCR 7052
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 4016(b), 55 DCR 7598
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 4002(a), 57 DCR 181
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 4022(b), 57 DCR 6242
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 402(b), 58 DCR 1008
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 4003(c), 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 4002(b), 59 DCR 8025
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 4002(b), 60 DCR 12472
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 4002(b), 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 4002(a), 62 DCR 10905
1981 Ed., § 31-2904.
D.C. Law 14-190 rewrote the section which had read as follows: Grade levels Weighting Total per pupil allocation in FY
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 rewrote the schedule.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote the schedule.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote the schedule.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “2016” for “2015” in the schedule.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 38-2901.
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 38-2901.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102(b) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102(b) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3302(c) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102(b) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 312(b) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 312(b) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(b) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(b) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4012(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(c) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(c) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(c) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(c) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(a) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(a) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(a) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4022(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 402(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4003(c) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(b) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4002(b) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4002(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4002(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4002(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4002(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4002(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4002(a) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Short title: Section 4001 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle A of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Uniform Per Student Funding Formula for Public Schools and Public Charter Schools Amendment Act of 2009”.

Section 4001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title IV of the act may be cited as the “Funding for Public Amendment Act of 2013”.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.